Colorado, session 2026A, SB104.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-1-151 as
follows:
22-1-151. Key boxes required at schools - contents - immunity
- definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER" MEANS:
(I) FOR A SCHOOL OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INCLUDING A CHARTER
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SCHOOL THAT ENTERS INTO A CHARTER CONTRACT WITH A SCHOOL DISTRICT
PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF ARTICLE 30.5 OF THIS TITLE 22, THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT OR BOARD OF COOPERATIVE SERVICES;
(II) FOR A CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE CHARTER
SCHOOL INSTITUTE PURSUANT TO PART 5 OF ARTICLE 30.5 OF THIS TITLE 22,
THE SCHOOL;
(III) FOR A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, THE SCHOOL; OR
(IV) FOR ANY OTHER SCHOOL, THE BODY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE SCHOOL.
(b) "LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY" MEANS A SHERIFF'S OFFICE,
POLICE DEPARTMENT, OR TOWN MARSHAL'S OFFICE.
(c) "SCHOOL" MEANS A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE STATE THAT ENROLLS
STUDENTS IN ANY OF GRADES KINDERGARTEN THROUGH TWELFTH GRADE,
INCLUDING A CHARTER SCHOOL OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT, AN INSTITUTE
CHARTER SCHOOL, OR A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, WHERE STUDENTS ATTEND THE
SCHOOL FACILITIES. "SCHOOL" DOES NOT INCLUDE A HOME SCHOOL.
(2) (a) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2030, EACH LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER SHALL INSTALL AT EACH SCHOOL OF THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER AT LEAST ONE EXTERIOR KEY BOX THAT MEETS OR EXCEEDS
UNDERWRITERS LABORATORIES STANDARD 1037.
(b) EACH KEY BOX MUST BE INSTALLED AT AN APPROPRIATE
LOCATION TO PERMIT LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS EMERGENCY ACCESS TO
EACH BUILDING AND ROOM ON THE SCHOOL GROUNDS. THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL DETERMINE THE PRECISE LOCATION OF EACH
KEY BOX AT A SCHOOL AFTER CONSULTATION WITH LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES OF THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE SCHOOL
BUILDING IS LOCATED.
(c) EACH LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE EACH LOCAL
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE SCHOOL
BUILDING IS LOCATED WITH A KEY OR ACCESS CODE THAT PERMITS ACCESS
TO THE CONTENTS OF THE EXTERIOR KEY BOX.
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-104

(d) THIS SUBSECTION (2) DOES NOT REQUIRE A LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER TO INSTALL A NEW EXTERIOR KEY BOX AT A SCHOOL THAT HAS A
KEY BOX INSTALLED THAT SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS FOR EXTERIOR KEY
BOXES SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION.
(3) EACH KEY BOX REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION MUST CONTAIN:
(a) THE KEYS AND OTHER ACCESS CONTROL DEVICES NECESSARY TO
ACCESS EACH BUILDING AND ROOM ON THE ENTIRE SCHOOL GROUNDS; AND
(b) ACCURATE MAPS OF THE ENTIRE SCHOOL GROUNDS THAT
IDENTIFY AND LABEL:
(I) ACCESS POINTS TO EACH BUILDING'S INTERIOR, INCLUDING
ROOMS, DOORS, STAIRWELLS, AND HALLWAYS. THE MAPS MUST INCLUDE THE
IDENTIFIERS OR NAMES UTILIZED BY STAFF AND STUDENTS TO IDENTIFY THE
ROOMS, DOORS, STAIRWELLS, AND HALLWAYS ON THE MAP.
(II) LOCATIONS OF CRITICAL UTILITIES, KEY BOXES, AUTOMATED
EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATORS, TRAUMA KITS, AND OTHER EMERGENCY
RESPONSE AIDS; AND
(III) AREAS AT OR NEAR EACH BUILDING, INCLUDING PARKING
AREAS, ATHLETIC FIELDS, SURROUNDING ROADS, OUTBUILDINGS, AND
NEIGHBORING PROPERTIES.
(4) (a) THE CONTENTS OF A KEY BOX AND THE INFORMATION
CONTAINED THEREIN IS NOT A PUBLIC RECORD FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE
"COLORADO OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24.
(b) AN EMPLOYEE OF A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER OR SCHOOL IS
IMMUNE FROM CIVIL LIABILITY FOR DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF THE
INSTALLATION AND USE OF KEY BOXES REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION UNLESS
THE EMPLOYEE ACTED WITH GROSS NEGLIGENCE OR BAD FAITH.
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING THE REQUIREMENT TO INSTALL AN EXTERIOR
KEY BOX PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER IS NOT
REQUIRED TO INSTALL AN EXTERIOR KEY BOX AT A SCHOOL IF THE SCHOOL
HAS A KEY BOX THAT DOES NOT SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS FOR EXTERIOR
KEY BOXES SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION AND HAS AN
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-104

ALTERNATIVE PLAN AND PROCEDURES TO PROVIDE EMERGENCY ACCESS FOR
LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TO EACH BUILDING AND ROOM ON THE ENTIRE
SCHOOL GROUNDS.
(6) INSTALLING AN EXTERIOR KEY BOX AT A SCHOOL AS REQUIRED
BY THIS SECTION IS A PERMISSIBLE USE OF A DISBURSEMENT FROM THE
SCHOOL SECURITY DISBURSEMENT PROGRAM PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-33.5-1810 (3)(a). NOTWITHSTANDING THE REQUIREMENT TO INSTALL AN
EXTERIOR KEY BOX PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, A LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER IS NOT REQUIRED TO INSTALL AN EXTERIOR KEY BOX AT A SCHOOL
IF THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER APPLIED FOR BUT DOES NOT RECEIVE A
DISBURSEMENT FROM THE SCHOOL SECURITY DISBURSEMENT PROGRAM
CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-1810 THAT MAY BE USED TO INSTALL AN
EXTERIOR KEY BOX AT THE SCHOOL.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-202, amend
(6)(b)(XVII) and (6)(b)(XVIII); and add (6)(b)(XIX) as follows:
24-72-202. Definitions.
As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6) (b) "Public records" does not include:
(XVII) A complaint of harassment or discrimination, as described
in section 22-1-143, that is unsubstantiated and all records related to the
unsubstantiated complaint, including records of an investigation into the
complaint; or
(XVIII) Jail assessments conducted pursuant to section 30-10-530
(5)(d) or 24-31-118; OR
(XIX) THE CONTENTS OF A KEY BOX INSTALLED AT A SCHOOL, AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 22-1-151, AND THE INFORMATION CONTAINED
THEREIN.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-104

referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-104